District of Columbia statutes.
1-602.05

Development of new personnel system.

In accordance with the provisions of § 1-602.04, the Mayor and each personnel authority shall cause the development of unified systems for all employees of the District of Columbia government. Each employee of the District of Columbia government employed on December 31, 1979, shall be guaranteed no reduction of current pay and benefits except as provided in subchapter XXIV of this chapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 205, 25 DCR 5740
1973 Ed., § 1-332.5.
1981 Ed., § 1-602.5.